Vermont, session 2025-2026, H139.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Most secondary schools in Vermont do not employ any medical
personnel outside of school hours, when most athletic practices and events take
place, and injuries can occur at any time.
(2) In rural Vermont, where the majority of Vermont’s school athletic
facilities are located, emergency medical services (EMS) are spread thinly and
are frequently located a considerable distance away from the location of an
emergency call.
(3) Lack of rural cell phone coverage also impedes calling EMS to the
scene of an injury occurring at a secondary school athletic event.
(4) Many students are without personal or family transportation to
medical facilities on any given day and may delay seeking evaluation and
treatment that could be rendered by a licensed athletic trainer.
(5) Many students lack a primary care provider due to area shortages,
wait times, or family economic situation. For students of lower socioeconomic
status, an athletic trainer may be one of the only accessible medical providers.
Athletic trainers manage a myriad of injuries and illnesses and can make
proper referrals when warranted.
VT LEG #378668 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.139
2025 Page 3 of 5
(6) The scope of a licensed athletic trainer’s practice is codified in 26
V.S.A. chapter 83. It includes emergent care, first aid, and diagnostic skills for
various illnesses and injuries, such as concussion management, as well as the
capacity to get to know the whole athlete, both physically and mentally,
including the ability to recognize conditions such as eating disorders, anxiety,
and depression.
(7) Athletic trainers can educate individuals about, prevent, and
rehabilitate athletic-specific injuries and illnesses, which can in turn reduce the
stress placed on the broader health care network, which is already pushing the
limits of its capacity.
Sec. 2. SECONDARY SCHOOL USE OF ATHLETIC TRAINERS
WORKING GROUP; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Secondary School Use of Athletic
Trainers Working Group to study the need and available resources for
requiring the presence of a licensed athletic trainer at all secondary school
athletic events and practices.
(b) Membership. The Working Group shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Secretary of Education or designee;
(2) the Executive Director of the Vermont Principals’ Association or
designee;
VT LEG #378668 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.139
2025 Page 4 of 5
(3) the Executive Director of the Vermont School Boards Association or
designee;
(4) the Executive Director of the Vermont Superintendents Association
or designee;
(5) the Executive Director of the Vermont National Education
Association or designee;
(6) the Executive Director of the Vermont State Athletic Directors
Association or designee;
(7) the President of the Vermont Association of Athletic Trainers or
designee; and
(8) one licensed athletic trainer who practices at a secondary school,
appointed by the Vermont Association of Athletic Trainers.
(c) Powers and duties. The Working Group shall study the need and
available resources for requiring the presence of a licensed athletic trainer at all
secondary school athletic events and practices, including exploring how
athletic trainers could be shared between districts or supervisory unions in a
cost-effective manner.
(d) Assistance. The Working Group shall have the assistance of the
Agency of Education for the purposes of scheduling meetings and processing
compensation and reimbursement pursuant to subsection (g) of this section.
VT LEG #378668 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.139
2025 Page 5 of 5
(e) Report. On or before December 1, 2025, the Working Group shall
submit a written report to the House and Senate Committees on Education with
its findings and any recommendations for legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Secretary of Education shall call the first meeting of the
Working Group to occur on or before September 1, 2025.
(2) The Working Group shall select a chair from among its members at
the first meeting.
(3) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(4) The Working Group shall cease to exist on December 31, 2025.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Working Group
who are not employees of the State of Vermont and who are not otherwise
compensated or reimbursed for their attendance shall be entitled to per diem
compensation and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 1010
for not more than six meetings. These payments shall be made from monies
appropriated to the Agency of Education.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378668 v.4